Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.180

Organization meeting.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation an organization meeting of the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation shall be held, either within or without this state, at the call of a majority of the incorporators, for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing officers and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting. The incorporators calling the meeting shall give at least three days' notice thereof by mail to each director so named, which notice shall state the time and place of the meeting.

A first meeting of the members and shareholders may be held at the call of the directors, or a majority of them, upon at least three days' notice, for such purposes as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 36.]